Washington statutes.
RCW 43.211.040

211 services.

Only a service provider approved by WIN 211 may provide 211 telephone services. WIN 211 shall approve 211 service providers, after considering the following:

(1) The ability of the proposed 211 service provider to meet the national 211 standards recommended by the alliance of information and referral systems and adopted by the national 211 collaborative on May 5, 2000;

(2) The financial stability and health of the proposed 211 service provider;

(3) The community support for the proposed 211 service provider;

(4) The relationships with other information and referral services; and

(5) Such other criteria as WIN 211 deems appropriate.

[ 2003 c 135 s 5.]